Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1633
Local boards of health; records required.

The health department of such county, district or city-county, as provided in sections 71-1626 to 71-1636, shall keep minutes of all the meetings of the health boards, and shall retain the records of everything pertaining to expenses, income, complaints, work done, meetings had, pamphlets printed and distributed, cases handled, and of any other matters pertaining to the work of the board of health.

Laws 1943, c. 152, § 8, p. 560;

R.S.1943, § 71-1633.